Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 3. Suspension of License and Registration for Unsatisfied Judgment

§ 31-9-301.
Notice of failure to satisfy judgment.

Whenever any person fails within thirty (30) days to satisfy any judgment subject to this act, the clerk of court, or the judge of a court which has no clerk, in which the judgment is rendered within this state, shall forward to the division immediately a certified copy of the judgment.

If the defendant named in any certified copy of a judgment reported to the division is a nonresident, the division shall transmit a certified copy of the judgment to the official in charge of the issuance of licenses and registration certificates of the state of which the defendant is a resident.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 60-1512; W.S. 1957, § 31-297; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a), see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-302.
Suspension upon receipt of judgment; consent to continued license and registration.

Upon the receipt of a certified copy of a judgment, the division shall suspend the license and registration and the nonresident’s operating privilege of any person against whom judgment was rendered except as provided in W.S.

31-9-305

.

If the judgment creditor consents in writing, in a form prescribed by the division, that the judgment debtor be allowed license and registration or nonresident’s operating privilege, the judgment debtor may be allowed by the division until the consent is revoked in writing, notwithstanding default in the payment of the judgment, or of any installments thereof prescribed in W.S.

31-9-305

, provided the judgment debtor furnishes proof of financial responsibility.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 60-1513; W.S. 1957, § 31-298; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

§ 31-9-303.
Continued suspension until judgment satisfied; discharge in bankruptcy.

Except as provided in W.S.

31-9-305

, the license, registration and nonresident’s operating privilege shall not be renewed, nor shall any license or registration be issued in the name of the person, including any person not previously licensed, until every judgment is stayed, satisfied or discharged, except that a discharge in bankruptcy does satisfy the judgment for the purposes of this section.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 14; C.S. 1945, § 60-1514; W.S. 1957, § 31-299; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

§ 31-9-304.
When judgments deemed satisfied.

Judgments in excess of the amounts specified in W.S. 31-9-102(a)(xi) shall, for the purpose of this act only, be deemed satisfied when payments in the amounts so specified have been credited thereon. Payments made in settlement of any claims because of bodily injury, death or property damage arising from a motor vehicle accident shall be credited in reduction of the respective amounts so specified.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 15; C.S. 1945, § 60-1515; W.S. 1957, § 31-300; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence, see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).

§ 31-9-305.
Payment of judgments in installments; failure to meet payments.

A judgment debtor upon notice to the judgment creditor may apply to the court in which judgment was rendered for the privilege of paying the judgment in installments and the court, in its discretion and without prejudice to any other legal remedies which the judgment creditor may have, may order and fix the amounts and times of payment of the installments.

The division shall not suspend a license, registration or a nonresident’s operating privilege, and shall restore any license, registration or nonresident’s operating privilege suspended following nonpayment of a judgment, when the judgment debtor gives proof of financial responsibility and obtains an order permitting the payment of the judgment in installments, and while the payment of any installment is not in default.

If the judgment debtor fails to pay any installment as specified by the order, then upon notice of default, the division shall suspend the license, registration or nonresident’s operating privilege of the judgment debtor until the judgment is fully satisfied, as provided in this act.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 160, § 16; C.S. 1945, § 60-1516; W.S. 1957, § 31-301; Laws 1985, ch. 234, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (c), see § 31-9-102(a)(xiv).